Hawaii statutes.
§436B-3 Applicability; prevailing
provisions; construction. (a) The provisions of this chapter shall only
be applicable to the professions and vocations required by law to be regulated
by the licensing authority.

(b) Unless otherwise stated in this chapter,
chapters 26, 26H, 91, and 92 and the licensing laws or rules for the respective
profession or vocation shall prevail. This chapter shall apply whenever
chapters 26, 26H, 91, and 92 and the licensing laws or rules for the respective
profession or vocation are silent.

(c) This chapter shall be liberally construed
to protect the health, safety, and welfare of consumers of services provided by
a profession or vocation regulated by the licensing authority. [L 1991, c 111,
pt of §2; am L 2002, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next